Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2092.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 47.79 RCW to read as follows:(1) The department must convene a Washington state Amtrak Cascades passenger rail advisory committee. The scope of the committee's activities must include providing information, advice, and recommendations to the department, the office of the governor, and legislative transportation committee leadership on issues impacting passenger rail service, including performance improvements on passenger rail routes, station location and improvements, passenger train on-time performance, multimodal connectivity, and policy initiatives related to intercity passenger rail to benefit the public, communities served by passenger rail, and the environment. As part of this work, the committee shall consider available grant opportunities to support passenger rail and update the public on progress toward achieving the target goals for Amtrak Cascades service established in RCW 47.79.160.(2) Membership of the passenger rail advisory committee shall include:(a) One representative of the department;(b) One representative of the utilities and transportation commission;(c) One representative of the office of the governor;(d) One representative of a transit agency;(e) One representative of a regional transit authority;(f) Four representatives of passenger rail advocacy groups;(g) Six members who are riders of the Amtrak Cascades service, apply for appointment, and are selected by the department;(h) Two representatives of disability advocacy organizations;(i) One representative from the association of Washington cities;(j) One representative from the Washington state association of counties;(k) One representative of a tribal government;(l) One representative of BNSF;(m) One representative of Amtrak;(n) One representative of a rail labor organization;(o) One nonvoting ex officio member, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, serving in an advisory role from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives; and(p) One nonvoting ex officio member, appointed by the president of the senate, serving in an advisory role from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate.(3) Passenger rail advisory committee members are appointed to serve three-year terms. The department may modify initial terms served to stagger the terms of the appointed members.(4) The passenger rail advisory committee shall annually elect a chair and other officers from its membership as it deems appropriate.(5) The passenger rail advisory committee must meet at least quarterly, and shall initially convene no later than January of 2027. The passenger rail advisory committee must be convened at the call of the director of the department, or the director's designee, with notice provided at least 30 days prior to a meeting of the passenger rail advisory committee.(6) Members shall serve without compensation, with the exception of any member qualifying for a stipend under RCW 43.03.220(2), but are entitled to reimbursement for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.(7) Beginning December 1, 2027, the department must provide an annual report to the governor, the transportation committees of the legislature, and the joint transportation committee, detailing the activities of the passenger rail advisory committee and its recommendations, as well as passenger rail advisory committee member viewpoints not otherwise captured in its recommendations.--- END ---